Utah statutes.
48-2c-116.   Member or manager as a party to proceedings.

A member or manager of a company is not a proper party to proceedings by or against a company, except when the object is to enforce a member's or manager's right against, or liability to, the company.



Enacted by Chapter 260, 2001 General Session

